Utah statutes.
73-18-20.1.   Seizure of a vessel.

(1)  A peace officer, without a warrant, may seize and take possession of a vessel:

(a)  that is placed or being operated on the waters of this state with improper registration;

(b)  that the peace officer has reason to believe has been stolen;

(c)  on which any hull identification number or serial number for an engine or outboard motor has been defaced, altered, or obliterated;

(d)  that has been abandoned on public land, highways, or waters of this state; or

(e)  if the registration or title fees for the vessel or outboard motor have not been paid.

(2)  If necessary for the transportation of a seized vessel, the vessel's trailer may be seized to transport and store the vessel.

(3)  Any peace officer seizing or taking possession of a vessel under this section shall comply with the provisions of Section 41-6a-1406.

